Utah statutes.
48-2c-1805.   Court-ordered indemnification.
Unless a company's articles of organization provide otherwise, a manager of
the company who is or was a party to a proceeding may apply for
indemnification to the court or other decision-maker conducting the proceeding
or to another court of competent jurisdiction.  On receipt of an application,
the court, after giving any notice the court considers necessary, may order
indemnification in the following manner:
(1)  if the court determines that the manager is entitled to mandatory
indemnification under Section 48-2c-1803, the court shall order
indemnification, in which case the court shall also order the company to pay
the manager's reasonable expenses, including attorney's fees, incurred to
obtain court-ordered indemnification; and
(2)  if the court determines that the manager is fairly and reasonably
entitled to indemnification in view of all the relevant circumstances, whether
or not the manager met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in Section
48-2c-1802 or was adjudged liable as described in Subsection 48-2c-1802(4),
the court may order indemnification as the court determines to be proper,
except that the indemnification with respect to any proceeding in which
liability has been adjudged in the circumstances described in Subsection
48-2c-1802(4) is limited to reasonable expenses incurred.
